apertium-hun.hun.dix
    <pardef n="hang__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="ország__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="ág__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>at</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  
   <pardef n="bélyeg__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>gel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ünk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ük</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="adat__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="pont__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ot</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nak</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tal</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ban</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hoz</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nál</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>on</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>unk</l><r><s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juk</l><r><s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  
    <!-- sz ssz -->
    <pardef n="vála/sz__n">
        <e><p><l>sz</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szt</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sznak</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sszal</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szban</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szhoz</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szba</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sznál</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szon</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>sza</l><r>sz<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szunk</l><r>sz<s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szuk</l><r>sz<s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  
  <!-- sz ssz -->
    <pardef n="cserké/sz__n">
        <e><p><l>sz</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szt</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sznek</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sszel</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szben</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szhez</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szbe</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>sznél</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>szen</l><r>sz<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>sze</l><r>sz<s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szünk</l><r>sz<s n="px1ps"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>szük</l><r>sz<s n="px3ps"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

    <!-- reguler e -->
    <pardef n="kert__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tel</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ben</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ine"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>nél</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ade"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ses"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ek</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>je</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/></r></p></e>
        
        <e><p><l>jére</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="px3ss"/><s n="sg"/><s n="sub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ág"><i>ág</i><par n="ág__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agyag"><i>agyag</i><par n="hang__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajánlat"><i>ajánlat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alakzat"><i>alakzat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="állat"><i>állat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="álmatlanság"><i>álmatlanság</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alsónadrág"><i>alsónadrág</i><par n="hang__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alvilág"><i>alvilág</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áramlat"><i>áramlat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arcátlanság"><i>arcátlanság</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árvaság"><i>árvaság</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bambusz"><i>bambu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bámulat"><i>bámulat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bánat"><i>bánat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bányász"><i>bányá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barát"><i>barát</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barátság"><i>barátság</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barlang"><i>barlang</i><par n="hang__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barnaság"><i>barnaság</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bárpult"><i>bárpult</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bátorság"><i>bátorság</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bejárat"><i>bejárat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bírság"><i>bírság</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bizonylat"><i>bizonylat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bizottság"><i>bizottság</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boldogság"><i>boldogság</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bolondság"><i>bolondság</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bolt"><i>bolt</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boltozat"><i>boltozat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bot"><i>bot</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bozót"><i>bozót</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="busz"><i>bu</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="célpont"><i>célpont</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cirkusz"><i>cirku</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cukrász"><i>cukrá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csat"><i>csat</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cserkész"><i>cserké</i><par n="cserké/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cserkészcsapat"><i>cserkészcsapat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csillagász"><i>csillagá</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csipesz"><i>csipe</i><par n="cserké/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csodálat"><i>csodálat</i><par n="adat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csodaország"><i>csodaország</i><par n="ország__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csomag"><i>csomag</i><par n="hang__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csont"><i>csont</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csoport"><i>csoport</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="csúcspont"><i>csúcspont</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hang"><i>hang</i><par n="hang__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kert"><i>kert</i><par n="kert__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pont"><i>pont</i><par n="pont__n"/></e>
    <e lm="válasz"><i>vála</i><par n="vála/sz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árkusztangens"><p><l>árkusztangens</l><r>árkusztangens</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bőröndösmester"><p><l>bőröndösmester</l><r>bőröndösmester</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ecsetkezelés"><p><l>ecsetkezelés</l><r>ecsetkezelés</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="érdekszövetkezet"><p><l>érdekszövetkezet</l><r>érdekszövetkezet</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fényképfelvétel"><p><l>fényképfelvétel</l><r>fényképfelvétel</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gondolatjel"><p><l>gondolatjel</l><r>gondolatjel</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="időbélyegzés"><p><l>időbélyegzés</l><r>időbélyegzés</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="különvélemény"><p><l>különvélemény</l><r>különvélemény</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nemeslelkűség"><p><l>nemeslelkűség</l><r>nemeslelkűség</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sportöltözet"><p><l>sportöltözet</l><r>sportöltözet</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="többpártrendszer"><p><l>többpártrendszer</l><r>többpártrendszer</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="önrendelkezés"><p><l>önrendelkezés</l><r>önrendelkezés</r></p><par n="bélyeg__n"/></e>
